Hawaii statutes.
§132-1 County fire chiefs; powers and
duties. (a) Records. The fire chief of each county shall keep in the
county fire chief's office a record of all fires occurring in the county and of
all facts concerning the same, and shall make such compilations and statistical
investigations as the fire chief may deem proper, all of which shall be kept as
permanent records in the fire chief's office. All records shall be public,
except that any evidence in any investigation may, in the discretion of the
county fire chief, be withheld from the public.

(b) Investigations, generally. The fire chief
of each county shall:

(1) Investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances
of fires;

(2) Supervise and make or cause to be made
periodically a thorough inspection of all property which might constitute a
fire hazard within the county;

(3) Summon and compel the attendance of witnesses and
production of evidence and hold hearings and make orders in any matter under
the fire chief's jurisdiction;

(4) Cooperate with any and all other governmental
officers or agencies having jurisdiction in the matters. [L 1917, c 115, pt of
§49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(1, 3, 9);
RL 1945, §8525; RL 1955, §184-1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §15; am L 1963, c 114,
§3; HRS §132-1; am L 1978, c 241, §2(1); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next